Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.180

Contract management.

(1) The department must adopt uniform policies and procedures for the effective and efficient management of contracts by all state agencies. The policies and procedures must, at a minimum, include:

(a) Precontract procedures for selecting potential contractors based on their qualifications and ability to perform, including procedures to ensure compliance with chapter 39.19 RCW, and providing for participation of minority and women-owned businesses;

(b) Model complaint and protest procedures;

(c) Alternative dispute resolution processes;

(d) Incorporation of performance measures and measurable benchmarks in contracts;

(e) Model contract terms to ensure contract performance and compliance with state and federal standards, including terms to facilitate recovery of the costs of employee staff time that must be expended to bring a contract into substantial compliance, and terms required under RCW 41.06.142;

(f) Executing contracts using electronic signatures;

(g) Criteria for contract amendments;

(h) Postcontract procedures;

(i) Procedures and criteria for terminating contracts for cause or otherwise, including procedures and criteria for terminating performance-based contracts that are not achieving performance standards;

(j) A requirement that agencies, departments, and institutions of higher education monitor performance-based contracts, including contracts awarded pursuant to RCW 41.06.142, to ensure that all aspects of the contract are being properly performed and that performance standards are being achieved; and

(k) Any other subject related to effective and efficient contract management.

(2) An agency may not enter into a contract under which the contractor could charge additional costs to the agency, the department, the joint legislative audit and review committee, or the state auditor for access to data generated under the contract. A contractor under such a contract must provide access to data generated under the contract to the contracting agency, the joint legislative audit and review committee, and the state auditor.

(3) To the extent practicable, agencies should enter into performance-based contracts. Performance-based contracts identify expected deliverables and performance measures or outcomes. Performance-based contracts also use appropriate techniques, which may include but are not limited to, either consequences or incentives or both to ensure that agreed upon value to the state is received. Payment for goods and services under performance-based contracts should be contingent on the contractor achieving performance outcomes.

(4) An agency and contractor may execute a contract using electronic signatures.

(5) As used in subsection (2) of this section, "data" includes all information that supports the findings, conclusions, and recommendations of the contractor's reports, including computer models and the methodology for those models.

[ 2020 c 269 s 4; 2012 c 224 s 20.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—Application—2020 c 269: See notes following RCW 41.06.142.